Massachusetts, session 194th, S1851.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 94 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following words:-
If the member’s employer failed to maintain a record of the member’s physical
examination on entry into service, the member or employer may submit an affidavit attesting that
the member did undergo such an examination and that the examination failed to reveal evidence
of such condition. This affidavit shall constitute satisfactory evidence that the member
underwent such a physical.
SECTION 2. Section 94A of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following words:-
of 2

If the member’s employer failed to maintain a record of the member’s physical
examination on entry into service, the member or employer may submit an affidavit attesting that
the member did undergo such an examination and that the examination failed to reveal evidence
of such condition. This affidavit shall constitute satisfactory evidence that the member
underwent such a physical.
SECTION 3. Section 94B(1) of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following words:-
If the member’s employer failed to maintain a record of the member’s physical
examination on entry into service, the member or employer may submit an affidavit attesting that
the member did undergo such an examination and that the examination failed to reveal evidence
of such condition. This affidavit shall constitute satisfactory evidence that the member
underwent such a physical.
of 2